District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-902

Findings; purpose.

Repealed.

Sept. 13, 1978, D.C. Law 2-107, § 3, 25 DCR 1391
June 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-320, § 514, 60 DCR 3390
1981 Ed., § 2-1102.
1973 Ed., § 2-2502.
For temporary repeal of section, see § 515 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-599, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1017).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 515 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-44, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5381, 20 DCSTAT 1281).